apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 4
	Entries: 25160
	Sdefs: 69
	Paradigms: 525
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀl</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="emails">
    <e>
      <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="web"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>(www.|http://|https://|ftp://)[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-./]+[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9/]</re>      
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="web"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ip">
    <e>
      <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="web"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r>ex</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ex-</l>
          <r>ex</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-les">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-en</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-la">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'n</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-li">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'n</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-ho</l> 
        <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-l">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'en</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-m">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'ho</l> 
        <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-me">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-les</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-la</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'ls</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'l</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'n</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>'ls</l> 
        <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-li</l> 
        <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__anant-nos">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-les</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-la</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-els</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-el</l> 
        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-en</l> 
        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-hi</l> 
        <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-ho</l> 
        <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-los</l> 
        <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-li</l> 
        <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="exrepública"><par n="ex"/><i>repúbli</i><par n="acústi/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="exdona" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="ex"/><i>don</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="exespia" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="ex"/><i>espi</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e>       <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>       <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>       <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>       <par n="ip"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>       <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>       <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>       <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>       <par n="separ"/></e>
